Utah statutes.
26-21-12.   Issuance of new license after revocation -- Restoration.

(1)  If a license is revoked, the department may issue a new license only after it determines by inspection that the facility has corrected the conditions that were the basis of revocation and that the facility complies with all provisions of this chapter and applicable rules.

(2)  If the department does not renew a license because of noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter, the department may issue a new license only after the facility complies with all renewal requirements and the department determines that the interests of the public will not be jeopardized.

